Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-516
Reclamation district; board of directors; nonpartisan ballot; terms.

After the selection of the original board of directors of a reclamation district as provided for in subdivision (5) of section 46-516, their successors shall be elected at a statewide general election on the nonpartisan ballot. The term of each member of the board thus elected shall be six years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 112.